District of Columbia statutes.
42-2851.07

Penalties for noncompliance.

(a)

An owner who fails to comply with a requirement of this chapter shall pay a civil fine of no greater than 5 times the costs and damages caused by the noncompliance.

(b)

All fines collected pursuant to this section shall be paid into the Housing Production Trust Fund established by Chapter 28 of this title.

(c)

The Mayor may commence enforcement proceedings for any fine not paid within the time period set forth in regulations.

Apr. 19, 2002, D.C. Law 14-114, § 207, 49 DCR 1468